North Dakota, session 69, SB2364.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATIVE ASSEMBLY OF NORTH DAKOTA:
SECTION 1. LEGISLATIVE MANAGEMENT STUDY - UNIFORM COMMERCIAL CODE
PROPERTY RIGHTS. During the 2025-26 interim, the legislative management shall consider
studying the property rights of entitlement holders in Uniform Commercial Code transactions,
along with the jurisdiction for disputes between entitlement holders and securities
intermediaries. The study must review the provisions of the Uniform Commercial Code,
including a review of article 8, in relation to state law, federal law, and the law's interaction as it
relates to ownership of personal property. The study must seek input from relevant
stakeholders, including securities intermediaries. The legislative management shall report its
findings and recommendations, together with any legislation necessary to implement the
recommendations, to the seventieth legislative assembly.
Page No. 1 25.0840.03000